District of Columbia statutes.
1-1307

Records of divisions of squares and lots.

All records, or copies thereof, of the divisions of squares and lots heretofore made between the public and the original proprietors, or which are authorized by this chapter, shall be kept in the Office of the Surveyor of the District of Columbia, and the Surveyor shall put up, label, index, and preserve all the maps, charts, plats, plans, and other drawings and papers relating to the District of Columbia or which appertain to his office, and which may come to his office for deposit, record, or otherwise.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1427, ch. 854, § 1596
1981 Ed., § 1-907.
1973 Ed., § 1-607.